Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,100.01
Suspension; reinstatement fee.

Whenever an operator's license is suspended under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the licensee shall pay a reinstatement fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles as a prerequisite to reinstatement of such license in addition to complying with the other provisions of the act. Upon expiration of the applicable period of suspension and payment of the reinstatement fee, the operator's license shall be returned unless it is no longer valid. The reinstatement fee shall be fifty dollars. The department shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 12.